Utah statutes.
32A-4-301.   Definitions.
For purposes of this part, wine includes all alcoholic beverages defined as
wine under 27 U.S.C.  211 and 27 C.F.R.  Section 4.10 including the following
alcoholic beverages made in the manner of wine containing not less than 7% and
not more than 24% of alcohol by volume:
(1)  sparkling and carbonated wine;
(2)  wine made from condensed grape must;
(3)  wine made from other agricultural products than the juice of sound, ripe
grapes;
(4)  imitation wine;
(5)  compounds sold as wine;
(6)  vermouth;
(7)  cider;
(8)  perry; and
(9)  sake.
